District of Columbia statutes.
50-711

Labeling regulations.

The Mayor shall issue regulations establishing labeling requirements for clean-fuel vehicles operated by fleets in the covered areas.

History

Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-243, § 12
as added Mar. 14, 1995, D.C. Law 10-201, § 2(g), 41 DCR 7178